Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.413.040

Minimum employment requirements.

(1)(a) A person working as a paraeducator for a school district before or during the 2017-18 school year must meet the requirements of subsection (2) of this section by the date of hire for the 2019-20 school year or any subsequent school year.

(b) A person who has not previously worked as a paraeducator for a school district must meet the requirements of subsection (2) of this section by the date of hire for the 2018-19 school year or any subsequent school year.

(2) The minimum employment requirements for paraeducators are as provided in this subsection. A paraeducator must:

(a) Be at least 18 years of age and hold a high school diploma or its equivalent; and

(b) Meet one of the following requirements:

(i) Have received a passing score on one of the assessments approved by the board;

(ii) Hold an associate of arts degree;

(iii) Have earned 72 quarter credits or 48 semester credits at an institution of higher education; or

(iv) Have completed a registered apprenticeship program.

[ 2023 c 19 s 1; 2018 c 153 s 1; 2017 c 237 s 5.]